test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_taho_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  
  Noun - taho: # not checked
    taho+N+Sg+Nom: taˊho
    taho+N+Sg+Gen: taˊṿo
    taho+N+Sg+Acc: taˊṿo
    taho+N+Sg+Ill: taˊhon
    taho+N+Sg+Loc: tavvoost
    taho+N+Sg+Com: tavvoin
    taho+N+Sg+Abe: taˊṿottáá
    taho+N+Ess: tahhoon
    taho+N+Par: tahhood
    taho+N+Pl+Nom: taˊṿoh
    taho+N+Pl+Gen: taˊṿoi
    taho+N+Pl+Acc: taˊṿoid
    taho+N+Pl+Ill: tavvoid
    taho+N+Pl+Loc: taˊṿoin
    taho+N+Pl+Com: taˊṿoiguin
    taho+N+Pl+Abe: taˊṿoittáá
